Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-269
Greater quorum or voting requirements.

(MBCA 7.27) (a) The articles
of incorporation may provide for a greater quorum or voting requirement for
shareholders, or voting groups of shareholders, than is provided for by the
Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act.

(b) An amendment to the
articles of incorporation that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum
or voting requirement must meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted
by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum
and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever
is greater.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 69.